Utah statutes.
57-8-27.   Separate taxation.

(1)  Each unit and its percentage of undivided interest in the common or community areas and facilities shall be considered to be a parcel and shall be subject to separate assessment and taxation by each assessing unit, local district, and special service district for all types of taxes authorized by law, including ad valorem levies and special assessments.  Neither the building or buildings, the property, nor any of the common areas and facilities may be considered a parcel.

(2)  In the event any of the interests in real property made subject to this chapter by the declaration are leasehold interests, if the lease creating these interests is of record in the office of the county recorder, if the balance of the term remaining under the lease is at least 40 years at the time the leasehold interest is made subject to this chapter, if units are situated or are to be situated on or within the real property covered by the lease, and if the lease provides that the lessee shall pay all taxes and assessments imposed by governmental authority, then until 10 years prior to the date that the leasehold is to expire or until the lease is terminated, whichever first occurs, all taxes and assessments on the real property covered by the lease shall be levied against the owner of the lessee's interest.  If the owner of the reversion under the lease has executed the declaration and condominium plat, until 10 years prior to the date that the leasehold is to expire, or until the lease is terminated, whichever first occurs, all taxes and assessments on the real property covered by the lease shall be separately levied against the unit owners having an interest in the lease, with each unit owner for taxation purposes being considered the owner of a parcel consisting of his undivided condominium interest in the fee of the real property affected by the lease.

(3)  No forfeiture or sale of the improvements or the property as a whole for delinquent real estate taxes, special assessments, or charges shall divest or in anywise affect the title to an individual unit if the real estate taxes or duly levied share of the assessments and charges on the individual unit are currently paid.

(4)  Any exemption from taxes that may exist on real property or the ownership of the property may not be denied by virtue of the submission of the property to this chapter.

(5)  Timeshare interests and timeshare estates, as defined in Subsection 57-19-2(19), may not be separately taxed but shall be valued, assessed, and taxed at the unit level.  The value of timeshare interests and timeshare estates, for purposes of ad valorem taxation, shall be determined by valuing the real property interest associated with the timeshare interest or timeshare estate, exclusive of the value of any intangible property and rights associated with the acquisition, operation, ownership, and use of the timeshare interest or timeshare estate, including the fees and costs associated with the sale of timeshare interests and timeshare estates that exceed those fees and costs normally incurred in the sale of other similar properties, the fees and costs associated with the operation, ownership, and use of timeshare interests and timeshare estates, vacation exchange rights, vacation conveniences and services, club memberships, and any other intangible rights and benefits available to a timeshare unit owner.  Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring the assessment of any real property interest associated with a timeshare interest or timeshare estate at less than its fair market value.  Notice of assessment, delinquency, sale, or any other purpose required by law is considered sufficient for all purposes if the notice is given to the management committee.

